Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Bird" includes, but is not limited to, any species of domestic poultry including chicken, turkey, goose, or duck.(2) "Department" means the department of agriculture.(3) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her duly authorized representative.(4) "Foie gras" means the liver of a bird that has been specifically fed to produce a large, fatty liver.(5) "Force-feeding" means any process, whether implemented by hand or machine, of feeding a bird that causes the bird to ingest more food than a typical bird of the same species would consume voluntarily. Force-feeding methods include, but are not limited to, delivering feed through a tube or other device inserted into the bird's esophagus.(6) "Person" includes, but is not limited to, individuals, partnerships, corporations, associations, and retail and restaurant establishments.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A person may not force-feed a bird, or hire another person to force-feed a bird. This section does not apply if a person force-feeds a bird as directed by a veterinarian for the purpose of improving the bird's health.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A person may not knowingly sell, possess, transport, or distribute any foie gras or any product that has been produced using the practice of force-feeding.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. When the director determines that a person has violated any provisions of this chapter, the director may assess a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for each violation, and up to $1,000 per day each day the violation continues. Moneys collected under this section must be deposited into the state general fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The director has authority to administer and enforce this chapter, and may adopt rules as necessary consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. This act takes effect January 1, 2028.--- END ---